Maine, session 132, LD1671.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA c. 415 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 415
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER CREDIBILITY INFORMATION
DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS
§3881. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Chief law enforcement officer. "Chief law enforcement officer" means the
officially appointed or elected head of a law enforcement agency.
2. Credibility information. "Credibility information" means:
A. A sustained finding that a law enforcement officer:
(1) Has knowingly made an untruthful statement concerning a material fact or
knowingly omitted a material fact in any capacity or circumstance;
(2) Has demonstrated a pattern of bias based on race, religion, ethnicity, gender,
sexual orientation, age, disability, national origin or any other protected class;
(3) Is alleged to have committed or been charged with a felony or a crime involving
dishonesty;
(4) Has intentionally violated the constitutional or statutory rights of others; or
(5) Has tampered with or fabricated evidence;
B. Facts reflecting a law enforcement officer's impaired ability to perceive or recall the
truth of a matter;
C. A publicly aired allegation against a law enforcement officer claiming the officer to
be untruthful or biased; and
D. Facts reflecting that a law enforcement officer resigned from another law
enforcement agency after being accused of misconduct adversely reflecting the
officer's truthfulness, bias or commission of any crime.
3. Involved law enforcement officer. "Involved law enforcement officer" means a law
enforcement officer who is the subject of a report for credibility information under section
3882, subsection 1.
4. Law enforcement agency. "Law enforcement agency" has the same meaning as in
section 3701, subsection 1.
5. Law enforcement officer. "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as in
section 2801-A, subsection 5 and includes a volunteer or employee who performs or aids a
law enforcement function.
6. Prosecuting attorney's office. "Prosecuting attorney's office" means, as applicable,
the Office of the District Attorney or the Office of the Attorney General.
Page 1 - 132LR1115(01)

7. Sustained finding. "Sustained finding" means a final determination by an
investigating agency, commission, board, hearing officer, arbitrator or court, following an
investigation and an opportunity to respond to allegations or proposed punitive or
corrective actions, that the conduct of a law enforcement officer was found to violate the
law or a policy of a law enforcement agency.
§3882. Law enforcement agency disclosure to prosecuting attorney's office and officer
The following provisions govern a law enforcement agency's obligation to disclose
credibility information regarding a law enforcement officer to a prosecuting attorney's
office.
1. Duty to notify prosecuting attorney's office. A law enforcement agency shall
notify the prosecuting attorney's office of any credibility information regarding a law
enforcement officer who is a potential witness in a criminal prosecution.
2. Duty to notify involved law enforcement officer. At the same time it provides the
notice required pursuant to subsection 1, a law enforcement agency shall notify the
involved law enforcement officer of the notification to the prosecuting attorney's office.
§3883. Prosecuting attorney's office notice to involved law enforcement officer
The following provisions govern the notice a prosecuting attorney's office must provide
to an involved law enforcement officer and the officer's opportunity to correct or prevent
further disclosure of credibility information prior to the prosecuting attorney's office's
disclosure of the credibility information to the defendant in the case for which the involved
law enforcement officer is a potential witness.
1. Notice of possible disclosure to defendant. At least 10 calendar days, or as soon as
practicable, before a prosecuting attorney's office decides whether to disclose credibility
information to a defendant, the prosecuting attorney's office shall provide a written notice
to the involved law enforcement officer with a copy to the chief law enforcement officer
that, at a minimum, includes a notice of possible disclosure of credibility information to a
defendant, the officer's right to provide input to the prosecuting attorney's office before
disclosure to a defendant and the prosecuting attorney's office's procedural requirements
for the officer to provide the input. If more immediate notification of credibility
information to a defendant is necessary to accommodate an imminent hearing in a pending
criminal case or more immediate notification is determined to be in the interest of justice,
notification to the law enforcement officer must be provided within 5 calendar days before
the prosecuting attorney's officer provides notification to a defendant.
2. Law enforcement officer opportunity to respond. Within 5 calendar days of
receiving the notice from the prosecuting attorney's office pursuant to subsection 1, the
involved law enforcement officer may request an opportunity to provide input to the
prosecuting attorney's office before disclosure of any credibility information to a defendant.
3. Request for in camera review prior to disclosure. Before a prosecuting attorney's
office discloses credibility information to a defendant, the involved law enforcement
officer may request an in camera review of the credibility information in the Superior Court
to determine whether or to what extent the information may be disclosed.
§3884. Written policies and procedures
Page 2 - 132LR1115(01)

Law enforcement agencies and prosecuting attorney's offices shall adopt written
policies and procedures consistent with this chapter as follows.
1. Law enforcement agency. By January 1, 2026, a law enforcement agency shall
implement written policies and procedures for prompt disclosure of credibility information,
as required by section 3882.
2. Prosecuting attorney's office. By January 1, 2026, a prosecuting attorney's office
shall adopt written policies and procedures for:
A. Receiving credibility information notifications;
B. Maintaining a current record of all credibility information;
C. Establishing a process by which to notify a defendant of credibility information
under the Maine Rules of Unified Criminal Procedure, Rule 16;
D. Establishing a process for notifying other prosecuting attorney's offices in the State
of a current record of credibility information; and
E. Establishing a process for removing any credibility information found to be
inaccurate or false from the relevant prosecuting attorney's office's credibility
information disclosure notification record.
§3885. Action to remove credibility information
If credibility information with respect to a law enforcement officer is found to be
inaccurate or false and the prosecuting attorney's office continues to maintain the inaccurate
or false information in its record of credibility information established pursuant to section
3884, subsection 2, paragraph B, the involved law enforcement officer may petition the
Superior Court for a review of governmental action to remove the credibility information
from the relevant prosecuting attorney's office's credibility information records.